Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1193.
do enact as follows:AB1193,11Section 1. 48.02 (1) (d) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1193,2,3248.02 (1) (d) Permitting, allowing or encouraging a child to violate s. 944.30 3(1m) commit a sex act for anything of value.AB1193,24Section 2. 48.355 (2d) (a) 2. a. of the statutes is amended to read:AB1193,2,6548.355 (2d) (a) 2. a. A violation of s. 940.225, 944.30 (1m), 948.02, 948.025, 6948.05, 948.051, 948.055, 948.06, 948.085, 948.09 or 948.10.AB1193,37Section 3. 48.371 (3) (d) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1193,2,16848.371 (3) (d) Any involvement of the child, whether as victim or perpetrator, 9in sexual intercourse or sexual contact in violation of s. 940.225, 948.02, 948.025, or 10948.085, prostitution in violation of s. 944.30 (1m), trafficking in violation of s. 11940.302 (2) if s. 940.302 (2) (a) 1. b. applies, sexual exploitation of a child in violation 12of s. 948.05, trafficking of a child in violation of s. 948.051, or causing a child to view 13or listen to sexual activity in violation of s. 948.055, if the information is necessary 14for the care of the child or for the protection of any person living in the foster home, 15group home, or residential care center for children and youth or in the home of the 16relative or like-kin.AB1193,417Section 4. 48.57 (3p) (g) 3. of the statutes is amended to read:AB1193,3,14148.57 (3p) (g) 3. The person has been convicted of a violation of ch. 940, 944, 2or 948, other than a violation of s. 940.291, 940.34, 944.36, 948.45, 948.63, or 3948.70, or of a violation of the law of any other state or federal law that would be a 4violation of ch. 940, 944, or 948, other than a violation of s. 940.291, 940.34, 944.36, 5948.45, 948.63, or 948.70, if committed in this state, except that a county 6department or, in a county having a population of 750,000 or more, the department 7may make payments to a person applying for payments under sub. (3m) and a 8person receiving payments under sub. (3m) may employ in a position in which the 9person would have regular contact with the child for whom those payments are 10being made or permit to be an adult resident a person who has been convicted of a 11violation of s. 944.30 (1m), 944.31, or 944.33 or of a violation of the law of any other 12state or federal law that would be a violation of s. 944.30 (1m), 944.31, or 944.33 if 13committed in this state, if that violation occurred 20 years or more before the date of 14the investigation.AB1193,515Section 5. 51.20 (13) (cr) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1193,3,221651.20 (13) (cr) If the subject individual is before the court on a petition filed 17under a court order under s. 938.30 (5) (c) 1. and is found to have committed a 18violation that would be a felony if committed by an adult in this state or a violation 19of s. 940.225 (3m), 941.20 (1), 944.20, 944.30 (1m), 944.31 (1), 944.33, 946.52, or 20948.10 (1) (b), the court shall require the individual to provide a biological specimen 21to the state crime laboratories for deoxyribonucleic acid analysis. The court shall 22inform the individual that he or she may request expungement under s. 165.77 (4).AB1193,623Section 6. 103.10 (1m) (b) 6. of the statutes is amended to read:AB1193,4,324103.10 (1m) (b) 6. “Sexual abuse” means conduct that is in violation of s. 1940.225, 944.30 (1m), 948.02, 948.025, 948.05, 948.051, 948.055, 948.06, 948.085, 2948.09, or 948.10 or that is in violation of s. 940.302 (2) if s. 940.302 (2) (a) 1. b. 3applies.AB1193,74Section 7. 103.34 (1) (b) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:AB1193,4,125103.34 (1) (b) 2. A violation of s. 940.01, 940.02, 940.03, 940.05, 940.06, 6940.07, 940.08, 940.09, 940.10, 940.19 (2), (4), (5), or (6), 940.198 (2), 940.21, 7940.225 (1), (2), or (3), 940.23, 940.235, 940.24, 940.25, 940.30, 940.302, 940.305, 8940.31, 943.02, 943.03, 943.04, 943.10, 943.30, 943.31, 943.32, 944.32, 944.34, 9946.10, 948.02 (1) or (2), 948.025, 948.03 (2), (3), or (5) (a) 1., 2., 3., or 4., 948.04, 10948.05, 948.051, 948.055, 948.06, 948.07, 948.075, 948.08, 948.085, 948.11 (2) (a) or 11(am), 948.12, 948.125, 948.13, 948.21 (2), 948.215, or 948.30 or of a substantially 12similar federal law or law of another state.AB1193,813Section 8. 134.47 of the statutes is created to read:AB1193,4,1414134.47 Sex workers’ bill of rights. (1) Definitions. In this section:AB1193,4,1615(a) “Sex work” means performing consensual sexual services or erotic 16performances or related activities in exchange for money or goods or other benefits.AB1193,4,1817(b) “Sex worker” means an individual who performs sex work and includes an 18individual working independently, as an employee, or under contractual agreement.AB1193,4,2119(2) Rights of sex workers. (a) Sex workers shall not be subject to criminal 20prosecution for engaging in sex work. Law enforcement agencies may not arrest, 21charge, or prosecute individuals solely for engaging in sex work.AB1193,5,222(b) Sex workers have the same rights and protections as other workers in this 23state, including minimum wage and hour protections; protection against 24discrimination, harassment, and unsafe working conditions; access to workers’ 1compensation and health benefits as applicable; and protection of privacy and 2freedom from surveillance.AB1193,5,63(c) Sex workers have the right to a safe and healthy work environment. 4Employers, clients, and those benefiting from the services of sex workers must 5ensure safe working conditions, including protection from violence, exploitation, 6and human trafficking.AB1193,5,107(d) Sex workers who operate as independent contractors shall be treated as 8legitimate sole proprietors or businesses. Sex workers shall have the right to 9control their work, negotiate fair contracts, and receive payment for their services 10without interference or exploitation.AB1193,5,1411(e) No person may discriminate against a sex worker in access to housing, 12public services, financial services, or health care based on their status as a sex 13worker. All laws protecting workers from discrimination on the basis of a protected 14class shall apply to sex workers.AB1193,915Section 9. 165.60 of the statutes is amended to read:AB1193,6,316165.60 Law enforcement. The department of justice is authorized to 17enforce ss. 101.123 (2), (2m), and (8), 175.60 (17) (e), 944.30 (1m), 944.31, 944.33, 18944.34, 945.02 (2), 945.03 (1m), 945.04 (1m), and 948.081 and ch. 108 and, with 19respect to a false statement submitted or made under s. 175.60 (7) (b) or (15) (b) 2. 20or as described under s. 175.60 (17) (c), to enforce s. 946.32, is authorized to assist 21the department of workforce development in the investigation and prosecution of 22suspected fraudulent activity related to worker’s compensation as provided in s. 23102.125, and is invested with the powers conferred by law upon sheriffs and 24municipal police officers in the performance of those duties. This section does not 1deprive or relieve sheriffs, constables, and other local police officers of the power 2and duty to enforce those sections, and those officers shall likewise enforce those 3sections.AB1193,104Section 10. 165.70 (1) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1193,6,85165.70 (1) (b) Except as provided in sub. (1m), enforce chs. 945 and 961 and ss. 6940.20 (3), 940.201, 941.25, 941.26, 943.01 (2) (c), 943.011, 943.27, 943.28, 943.30, 7944.30 (1m), 944.31, 944.32, 944.33, 944.34, 946.65, 947.02 (3) and (4), 948.075, 8948.08, and 948.081.AB1193,119Section 11. 165.76 (1) (am) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1193,6,1210165.76 (1) (am) Is or was adjudicated delinquent for an act that if committed 11by an adult in this state would be a felony or for a violation of s. 940.225 (3m), 12941.20 (1), 944.20, 944.30 (1m), 944.31 (1), 944.33, 946.52, or 948.10 (1) (b).AB1193,1213Section 12. 440.312 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1193,6,1814440.312 (2) The department may not grant a license under this subchapter to 15any person who has been convicted of an offense under s. 940.22, 940.225, 940.302 16(2) (a) 1. b., 944.06, 944.15, 944.17, 944.30 (1m), 944.31, 944.32, 944.33, 944.34, 17948.02, 948.025, 948.051, 948.06, 948.07, 948.075, 948.08, 948.081, 948.09, 18948.095, 948.10, 948.11, 948.12, or 948.125.AB1193,1319Section 13. 440.982 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1193,6,2420440.982 (2) The department may not grant a license under this subchapter to 21any person who has been convicted of an offense under s. 940.22, 940.225, 944.06, 22944.15, 944.17, 944.30 (1m), 944.31, 944.32, 944.33, 944.34, 948.02, 948.025, 23948.051, 948.06, 948.07, 948.075, 948.08, 948.081, 948.09, 948.095, 948.10, 948.11, 24948.12, or 948.125 or under s. 940.302 (2) if s. 940.302 (2) (a) 1. b. applies.AB1193,141Section 14. 460.05 (1) (h) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:AB1193,7,42460.05 (1) (h) 1. An offense under s. 940.22, 940.225, 944.15, 944.17, 944.30 3(1m), 944.31, 944.32, 944.33, 944.34, 948.02, 948.025, 948.08, 948.081, 948.085, 4948.09, 948.095, or 948.10.AB1193,155Section 15. 460.12 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1193,7,126460.12 (1) A license holder shall submit a report to the affiliated 7credentialing board if he or she has reasonable cause to believe that another license 8holder has committed a crime relating to prostitution under ss. 944.30 to 944.34 or 9has had sexual contact or sexual intercourse with a client. If the report relates to 10sexual contact or sexual intercourse with a client, the The report may not identify 11the client unless the client has provided written consent for disclosure of this 12information.AB1193,1613Section 16. 460.14 (2m) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1193,7,1614460.14 (2m) (a) An offense under s. 940.22, 940.225, 944.15, 944.17, 944.30 15(1m), 944.31, 944.32, 944.33, 944.34, 948.02, 948.025, 948.08, 948.081, 948.085, 16948.09, 948.095, or 948.10.AB1193,1717Section 17. 938.34 (15) (a) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:AB1193,7,2418938.34 (15) (a) 1. If the juvenile is adjudicated delinquent on the basis of a 19violation that would be a felony if committed by an adult in this state or of a 20violation of s. 940.225 (3m), 941.20 (1), 944.20, 944.30 (1m), 944.31 (1), 944.33, 21946.52, or 948.10 (1) (b), the court shall require the juvenile to comply with the 22requirement under s. 165.76 (1) (am) by providing a biological specimen to the state 23crime laboratories for deoxyribonucleic acid analysis. The court shall inform the 24juvenile that he or she may request expungement under s. 165.77 (4).AB1193,181Section 18. 938.355 (2d) (a) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:AB1193,8,62938.355 (2d) (a) 2. “Sexual abuse” means a violation of s. 940.225, 944.30 3(1m), 948.02, 948.025, 948.05, 948.055, 948.06, 948.085, 948.09 or 948.10 or a 4violation of the law of any other state or federal law if that violation would be a 5violation of s. 940.225, 944.30 (1m), 948.02, 948.025, 948.05, 948.055, 948.06, 6948.085 (2), 948.09 or 948.10 if committed in this state.AB1193,197Section 19. 938.371 (3) (d) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1193,8,168938.371 (3) (d) Any involvement of the juvenile, whether as victim or 9perpetrator, in sexual intercourse or sexual contact in violation of s. 940.225, 10948.02, 948.025, or 948.085, prostitution in violation of s. 944.30 (1m), trafficking in 11violation of s. 940.302 (2) if s. 940.302 (2) (a) 1. b. applies, sexual exploitation of a 12child in violation of s. 948.05, trafficking of a child in violation of s. 948.051, or 13causing a child to view or listen to sexual activity in violation of s. 948.055, if the 14information is necessary for the care of the juvenile or for the protection of any 15person living in the foster home, group home, residential care center for children 16and youth, or juvenile correctional facility. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab1193 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab1193 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB1193 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB1193 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB1193: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting